src/numeral-sje-lex.txt
! Numerals

LEXICON Numeral

nolla num "noll, zero" ;
+Card ;
+Ord ;

LEXICON Card
ákkta num "ett, one" ;
guäkkte num "två, two" ;
gålbmå num "tre, three" ;
nällje num "fyra, four";
vihta num "fem, five" ;
guhta num "sex, six" ;
gietjav num "sju, seven" ;
gákktse num "åtta, eight" ;
åkktse num "nio, nine" ;
lågev num "tio, ten" ;

LEXICON Ord
vuostas num "första, first" ;
mobbe num "andra, second" ;
gålmat num "tredje, thrid" ;
nieljat num "fjärde, fourth" ;
vedat num "femte, fifth" ;
gudat num "sjätte, sixth" ;
giehtjet num "sjunde, seventh" ;
gákktsat num "åttonde , eighth" ;
åkktsat num "nionde, ninth" ;
lågat num "tionde, tenth" ;

LEXICON num
+Num: # ;
